Utah statutes.
70A-2-203.   Seals inoperative.
The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a contract for sale or an offer
to buy or sell goods does not constitute the writing a sealed instrument and
the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to such a contract
or offer.
